itext/src/main/resources/com/itextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/fr.xml
<patterns>
2’2
.a4
’a4
.â4
’â4
ab2h
.ab3réa
’ab3réa
ad2h
a1è2dre
.ae3s4ch
’ae3s4ch
1alcool
a2l1algi
.amino1a2c
’amino1a2c
.ana3s4tr
’ana3s4tr
1a2nesthési
.anti1a2
’anti1a2
.anti1e2
’anti1e2
.anti1é2
.anti2enne
’anti2enne
’anti1é2
.anti1s2
’anti1s2
.apo2s3ta
’apo2s3ta
apo2s3tr
archi1é2pis
.as2ta
’as2ta
a2s3tro
1ba
1bâ
.bai2se3main
1be
1bé
1bè
1bê
4be.
4bes.
2bent.
1bi
1bî
.bi1a2c
.bi1a2t
.bi1au
.bio1a2
.bi2s1a2
.bi1u2
1b2l
4ble.
4bles.
2blent.
1bo
1bô
1b2r
4bre.
4bres.
2brent.
1bu
1bû
1by
1ç
1ca
1câ
ca3ou3t2
1ce
1cé
1cè
1cê
4ce.
4ces.
2cent.
ja3cent.
ac3cent.
é3cent.
munifi3cent.
réti3cent.
privatdo3cent.
inno3cent.
es3cent.
acquies4cent.
is3cent.
immis4cent.
.ch4
1c2h
4ch.
2chb
4che.
4ches.
2chent.
.chè2vre3feuille
2chg
ch2l
4chle.
4chles.
chlo2r3a2c
chlo2r3é2t
2chm
2chn
2chp
ch2r
4chre.
4chres.
2chs
2cht
2chw
1ci
1cî
.ci2s1alp
1c2k
4ck.
2ckb
4cke.
4ckes.
2ckent.
2ckf
2ckg
2ck3h
2ckp
2cks
2ckt
1c2l
4cle.
4cles.
2clent.
1co
1cô
co1acc
co1acq
co1a2d
co1ap
co1ar
co1assoc
co1assur
co1au
co1ax
1cœ
co1é2
co1ef
co1en
co1ex
.con4
.cons4
.contre1s2c
.contre3maître
co2nurb
.co1o2
.co2o3lie
1c2r
4cre.
4cres.
2crent.
1cu
1cû
1cy
.cul4
1d’
1da
1dâ
.dacryo1a2
d1d2h
1de
1dé
1dè
1dê
4de.
4des.
2dent.
déca3dent.
é3dent.
cci3dent.
inci3dent.
confi3dent.
tri3dent.
dissi3dent.
chien3dent.
.ar3dent.
impu3dent.
pru3dent.
.dé1a2
.dé1io
.dé1o2
.dé2s
.dé3s2a3cr
.dés2a3m
.dé3s2a3tell
.dé3s2astr
.dé3s2c
.dé2s1é2
.dé3s2é3gr
.dé3s2ensib
.dé3s2ert
.dé3s2exu
.dé2s1i2
.dé3s2i3d
.dé3s2i3gn
.dé3s2i3li
.dé3s2i3nen
.dé3s2invo
.dé3s2i3r
.dé3s2ist
.dé3s2o3dé
.dé2s1œ
.dé3s2o3l
.dé3s2o3pil
.dé3s2orm
.dé3s2orp
.dé3s2oufr
.dé3s2p
.dé3s2t
.dé2s1u2n
3d2hal
3d2houd
1di
1dî
di2s3cop
.di1a2cé
.di1a2cid
.di1ald
.di1a2mi
.di1a2tom
.di1e2n
.di2s3h
2dlent.
1do
1dô
1d2r
4dre.
4dres.
2drent.
d1s2
1du
1dû
1dy
.dy2s3
.dy2s1a2
.dy2s1i2
.dy2s1o2
.dy2s1u2
.e4
’e4
.ê4
’ê4
.é4
’é4
.è4
’è4
éd2hi
1é2drie
1é2drique
1é2lectr
1é2lément
.en1a2
’en1a2
1é2nerg
e2n1i2vr
.en1o2
’en1o2
épi2s3cop
épi3s4cope
e2s3cop
.eu2r1a2
’eu2r1a2
eu1s2tat
extra1
extra2c
extra2i
1fa
1fâ
1fe
1fé
1fè
1fê
4fe.
4fes.
2fent.
1fi
1fî
1f2l
4fle.
4fles.
2flent.
1fo
1fô
1f2r
4fre.
4fres.
2frent.
f1s2
1fu
1fû
1fy
1ga
1gâ
1ge
1gé
1gè
1gê
4ge.
4ges.
2gent.
ré3gent.
entre3gent.
indi3gent.
dili3gent.
intelli3gent.
indul3gent.
tan3gent.
rin3gent.
contin3gent.
.ar3gent.
’ar3gent.
ser3gent.
ter3gent.
résur3gent.
1g2ha
1g2he
1g2hi
1g2ho
1g2hy
1gi
1gî
1g2l
4gle.
4gles.
2glent.
1g2n
’a2g3nat
.a2g3nat
a2g3nos
co2g3niti
’i2g3né
.i2g3né
’i2g3ni
.i2g3ni
.ma2g3nicide
.ma2g3nificat
.ma2g3num
o2g3nomoni
o2g3nosi
.pro2g3nath
pu2g3nable
pu2g3nac
.sta2g3n
.syn2g3nath
wa2g3n
4gne.
4gnes.
2gnent.
1go
1gô
1g2r
4gre.
4gres.
2grent.
1gu
1gû
g1s2
4gue.
4gues.
2guent.
.on3guent.
’on3guent.
1gy
1ha
1hâ
1he
1hé
1hè
1hê
hémi1é
hémo1p2t
4he.
4hes.
1hi
1hî
1ho
1hô
1hu
1hû
1hy
hypera2
hypere2
hyperé2
hyperi2
hypero2
hypers2
hype4r1
hyperu2
hypo1a2
hypo1e2
hypo1é2
hypo1i2
hypo1o2
hypo1s2
hypo1u2
.i4
’i4
.î4
’î4
i1algi
i1arthr
i1è2dre
il2l
cil3l
rcil4l
ucil4l
vacil4l
gil3l
hil3l
lil3l
l3lion
mil3l
mil4let
émil4l
semil4l
rmil4l
armil5l
capil3l
papil3la
papil3le
papil3li
papil3lom
pupil3l
piril3l
thril3l
cyril3l
ibril3l
pusil3l
.stil3l
distil3l
instil3l
fritil3l
boutil3l
vanil3lin
vanil3lis
vil3l
avil4l
chevil4l
uevil4l
uvil4l
xil3l
1informat
.in1a2
’in1a2
.in2a3nit
’in2a3nit
.in2augur
’in2augur
.in1e2
’in1e2
.in1é2
’in1é2
.in2effab
’in2effab
.in2é3lucta
’in2é3lucta
.in2é3narra
’in2é3narra
.in2ept
’in2ept
.in2er
’in2er
.in2exora
’in2exora
.in1i2
’in1i2
.in2i3miti
’in2i3miti
.in2i3q
’in2i3q
.in2i3t
’in2i3t
.in1o2
’in1o2
.in2o3cul
’in2o3cul
.in2ond
’in2ond
.in1s2tab
’in1s2tab
’inte4r3
.intera2
’intera2
.intere2
’intere2
.interé2
’interé2
.interi2
’interi2
.intero2
’intero2
.inte4r3
.interu2
’interu2
.inters2
’inters2
.in1u2
’in1u2
.in2uit
’in2uit
.in2u3l
’in2u3l
io1a2ct
i1oxy
i1s2tat
1j
2jk
4je.
4jes.
2jent.
1ka
1kâ
1ke
1ké
1kè
1kê
4ke.
4kes.
2kent.
1k2h
4kh.
.kh4
1ki
1kî
1ko
1kô
1k2r
1ku
1kû
1ky
1la
1lâ
1là
la2w3re
1le
1lé
1lè
1lê
4le.
4les.
2lent.
.ta3lent.
iva3lent.
équiva4lent.
monova3lent.
polyva3lent.
re3lent.
.do3lent.
indo3lent.
inso3lent.
turbu3lent.
succu3lent.
fécu3lent.
trucu3lent.
opu3lent.
corpu3lent.
ru3lent.
sporu4lent.
1li
1lî
1lo
1lô
l1s2t
1lu
1lû
1ly
1ma
1mâ
.ma2c3k
.macro1s2c
.ma2l1a2dres
.ma2l1a2dro
.ma2l1aisé
.ma2l1ap
.ma2l1a2v
.ma2l1en
.ma2l1int
.ma2l1oc
.ma2l1o2d
.ma2r1x
1me
1mé
1mè
1mê
.mé2g1oh
.mé2sa
.mé3san
.mé2s1es
.mé2s1i
.mé2s1u2s
.méta1s2ta
4me.
4mes.
â2ment.
da2ment.
fa2ment.
amalga2ment.
cla2ment.
ra2ment.
tempéra3ment.
ta2ment.
testa3ment.
qua2ment.
è2ment.
carê2ment.
diaphrag2ment.
ryth2ment.
ai2ment.
rai3ment.
abî2ment.
éci2ment.
vidi2ment.
subli2ment.
éli2ment.
reli2ment.
mi2ment.
ani2ment.
veni2ment.
ri2ment.
détri3ment.
nutri3ment.
inti2ment.
esti2ment.
l2ment.
flam2ment.
gram2ment.
.gem2ment.
om2ment.
.com3ment.
ô2ment.
slalo2ment.
chro2ment.
to2ment.
ar2ment.
.sar3ment.
er2ment.
antifer3ment.
.ser3ment.
fir2ment.
or2ment.
as2ment.
au2ment.
écu2ment.
fu2ment.
hu2ment.
fichu3ment.
llu2ment.
plu2ment.
bou2ment.
bru2ment.
su2ment.
tu2ment.
1mi
1mî
.milli1am
1m2némo
1m2nès
1m2nési
1mo
1mô
1mœ
.mono1a2
.mono1e2
.mono1é2
.mono1i2
.mono1ï2dé
.mono1o2
.mono1u2
.mono1s2
mon2t3réal
m1s2
1mu
1mû
1my
moye2n1â2g
1na
1nâ
1ne
1né
1nè
1nê
4ne.
4nes.
2nent.
réma3nent.
imma3nent.
perma3nent.
.émi3nent.
préémi3nent.
proémi3nent.
surémi3nent.
immi3nent.
conti3nent.
perti3nent.
absti3nent.
1ni
1nî
1no
1nô
1nœ
.no2n1obs
1nu
1nû
n3s2at.
n3s2ats.
n1x
1ny
.o4
’o4
’ô4
.ô4
o2b3long
1octet
o1d2l
o1è2dre
o1ioni
ombud2s3
omni1s2
o1s2tas
o1s2tat
o1s2téro
o1s2tim
o1s2tom
o1s2trad
o1s2tratu
o1s2triction
.oua1ou
’oua1ou
.ovi1s2c
’ovi1s2c
oxy1a2
1pa
1pâ
paléo1é2
.pa2n1a2f
.pa2n1a2mé
.pa2n1a2ra
.pa2n1is
.pa2n1o2ph
.pa2n1opt
.pa2r1a2che
.pa2r1a2chè
.para1s2
.pa2r3hé
1pe
1pé
1pè
1pê
4pe.
4pes.
2pent.
re3pent.
.ar3pent.
’ar3pent.
ser3pent.
.pen2ta
per3h
pé2nul
.pe4r
.per1a2
.per1e2
.per1é2
.per1i2
.per1o2
.per1u2
pé1r2é2q
.péri1os
.péri1s2
.péri2s3s
.péri2s3ta
.péri1u2
1p2h
.ph4
4ph.
.phalan3s2t
4phe.
4phes.
2phent.
ph2l
4phle.
4phles.
2phn
photo1s2
ph2r
4phre.
4phres.
2phs
2pht
3ph2talé
3ph2tis
1pi
1pî
1p2l
4ple.
4ples.
2plent.
.pluri1a
1p2né
1p2neu
1po
1pô
po1astre
poly1a2
poly1e2
poly1é2
poly1è2
poly1i2
poly1o2
poly1s2
poly1u2
.pon2tet
.pos2t3h
.pos2t1in
.pos2t1o2
.pos2t3r
.post1s2
1p2r
4pre.
4pres.
2prent.
.pré1a2
.pré2a3la
.pré2au
.pré1é2
.pré1e2
.pré1i2
.pré1o2
.pré1u2
.pré1s2
.pro1é2
.pro1s2cé
pro2s3tat
.prou3d2h
1p2sych
.psycho1a2n
1p2tèr
1p2tér
1pu
.pud1d2l
1pû
1py
1q
4que.
4ques.
2quent.
é3quent.
élo3quent.
grandilo3quent.
1ra
1râ
radio1a2
1re
1ré
1rè
1rê
.ré1a2
.ré2a3le
.ré2a3lis
.ré2a3lit
.ré2aux
.ré1é2
.ré1e2
.ré2el
.ré2er
.ré2èr
.ré1i2
.ré2i3fi
.ré1o2
.re1s2
.re2s3cap
.re2s3cisi
.re2s3ciso
.re2s3cou
.re2s3cri
.re2s3pect
.re2s3pir
.re2s3plend
.re2s3pons
.re2s3quil
.re2s3s
.re2s3t
.re3s4tab
.re3s4tag
.re3s4tand
.re3s4tat
.re3s4tén
.re3s4tér
.re3s4tim
.re3s4tip
.re3s4toc
.re3s4top
.re3s4tr
.re4s5trein
.re4s5trict
.re4s5trin
.re3s4tu
.re3s4ty
.réu2
.ré2uss
.rétro1a2
4re.
4res.
2rent.
.pa3rent.
appa3rent.
transpa3rent.
é3rent.
tor3rent.
cur3rent.
1r2h
4rhe.
4rhes.
2r3heur
2r3hydr
1ri
1rî
1ro
1rô
1ru
1rû
1ry
1sa
1sâ
.sch4
1s2caph
1s2clér
1s2cop
1s2ch
e2s3ch
i2s3ché
i2s3chia
i2s3chio
4sch.
4sche.
4sches.
2schs
1se
1sé
1sè
1sê
sesqui1a2
4se.
4ses.
2sent.
ab3sent.
pré3sent.
.res3sent.
.seu2le
.sh4
1s2h
4sh.
4she.
4shes.
2shent.
2shm
2s3hom
2shr
2shs
1si
1sî
1s2lav
1s2lov
1so
1sô
1sœ
1s2patia
1s2perm
1s2por
1s2phèr
1s2phér
1s2piel
1s2piros
1s2tandard
1s2tein
stéréo1s2
1s2tigm
1s2tock
1s2tomos
1s2troph
1s2tructu
1s2tyle
1su
1sû
.su2b1a2
.su3b2alt
.su2b1é2
.su3b2é3r
.su2b1in
.su2b3limin
.su2b3lin
.su2b3lu
sub1s2
.su2b1ur
supero2
supe4r1
supers2
.su2r1a2
su3r2ah
.su3r2a3t
.su2r1e2
.su3r2eau
.su3r2ell
.su3r2et
.su2r1é2
.su2r3h
.su2r1i2m
.su2r1inf
.su2r1int
.su2r1of
.su2r1ox
1sy
1ta
1tâ
1tà
tachy1a2
tchin3t2
1te
1té
1tè
1tê
télé1e2
télé1i2
télé1o2b
télé1o2p
télé1s2
4te.
4tes.
2tent.
.la3tent.
.pa3tent.
compé3tent.
éni3tent.
mécon3tent.
omnipo3tent.
ventripo3tent.
équipo3tent.
impo3tent.
mit3tent.
.th4
1t2h
4th.
4the.
4thes.
thermo1s2
2t3heur
2thl
2thm
2thn
th2r
4thre.
4thres.
2ths
1ti
1tî
1to
1tô
1t2r
tran2s1a2
tran3s2act
tran3s2ats
tran2s3h
tran2s1o2
tran2s3p
tran2s1u2
4tre.
4tres.
2trent.
.tri1a2c
.tri1a2n
.tri1a2t
.tri1o2n
t1t2l
1tu
1tû
tung2s3
1ty
.u4
’u4
.û4
’û4
uni1o2v
uni1a2x
u2s3tr
1va
1vâ
1ve
1vé
1vè
1vê
vélo1s2ki
4ve.
4ves.
2vent.
conni3vent.
.sou3vent.
1vi
1vî
1vo
1vô
vol2t1amp
1v2r
4vre.
4vres.
2vrent.
1vu
1vû
1vy
1wa
1we
4we.
4wes.
2went.
1wi
1wo
1wu
1w2r
2xent.
.y4
’y4
y1asth
y1s2tom
y1algi
1za
1ze
1zé
1zè
4ze.
4zes.
2zent.
privatdo3zent.
1zi
1zo
1zu
1zy
</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
